src/mdf-lex.txt
LEXICON Root
TESTINGTESTING ;
!SUBSTANDARDS ; ! temporary solution

! contlexes                             ! the file, where the contlex is located
! ------------                          ! ---------------------------------------
A ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/A_mdf-lex.xml
ADV ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/ADV_mdf-lex.xml
!AD-A ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/AD-A_mdf-lex.xml
Abbreviation ;                          ! abbr-mdf-lex.txt
!ABBR ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/ABBR_mdf-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
Acronym ;                               ! acro-mdf-lex.txt
!ACRON ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/ACRON_mdf-lex.xml 
!BAHUVRIHI ;                             ! ../../tmp/out/BAHUVRIHI_mdf-lex.xml
CONJ ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/CONJ_mdf-lex.xml
!DEM ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/DEM_mdf-lex.xml !! Dem can be Adn or Pron
!DV-N ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/DV-N_mdf-lex.xml
!IDIOM ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/IDIOM_mdf-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
INTERJ ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/INTERJ_mdf-lex.xml
!MANNER ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/MANNER_mdf-lex.xml
N ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/N_mdf-lex.xml
                                        ! working_files/PHRASE-N_mdf-lex.xml
                                        ! working_files/PHRASE-V_mdf-lex.xml
PTC ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/PTC_mdf-lex.xml !! 
!N-DV ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/N-DV_mdf-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
!N-F ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/N-F_mdf-lex.xml            !2012-03-14
!No-e-element-N ;                       ! ../../tmp/out/No-e-element-N_mdf-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!No-e-element-V ;                       ! ../../tmp/out/No-e-element-V_mdf-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!QNT ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/QNT_mdf-lex.xml
NUM ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/NUM_mdf-lex.xml            !2012-03-14
!NUM-PREFIXES ;                         ! num-mdf-morph.txt                        !2012-03-14
PCLE ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PCLE_mdf-lex.xml    ! particles
!PART-ONOM ;                            ! ../../tmp/out/PART-ONOM_mdf-lex.xml      !2012-03-14
!PERS ;                                  ! pronoun !pers-mdf-morph.txt
                                        ! ../../tmp/out/PERS_mdf-lex.xml.txt
POSTP ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/POSTP_mdf-lex.xml.txt

PRON ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PRON_mdf-lex.xml
!PRON-INDEF ;                           ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-INDEF_mdf-lex.xml                           !2012-03-14
!PRON-INTER ;                           ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-INTER_mdf-lex.xml                           !2012-03-14
!PRON-NEG ;                             ! pron-mdf-morph.txt                                             !2012-03-14
!PRON-QNT ;                             ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-QNT_mdf-lex.xml                             !2012-03-14
!PRON-REFL ;                            ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-REFL_mdf-lex.xml                            !2012-03-14
!PRON-REL ;                             ! pron-mdf-morph.txt                                             !2012-03-14
! PROP ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PROP_mdf-lex.xml
!PROP-RUSSIAN-TOPONYMS ;                ! ../../tmp/out/PROPRUSSIAN-TOPONYMS_mdf-lex.xml                 !2012-03-14
!PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-SURNAMES-Derivable ; ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-SURNAMES-Derivable_mdf-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-SURNAMES ;          ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-SURNAMES_mdf-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
!PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-NAMES-Derivable ;    ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-NAMES-Derivable_mdf-lex.xml    !2012-03-14
!PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES ;              ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES_mdf-lex.xml
!PROP-CYRILLIC-FEMALE-NAMES ;            ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES_mdf-lex.xml
Punctuation ;                           ! punct-mdf-lex.txt
!SPAT ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/SPAT_mdf-lex.xml.txt
!TEMP ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/TEMP_mdf-lex.xml.txt
V ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/VB_mdf-lex.xml


!VERBNEGATIVE ;                          ! verb-mdf-morph.txt




! ======================================================= !
! These lexica are for parts of speech without morphology !
! ======================================================= !

! Compounding

LEXICON R
%- N ;


! ============ !
! Interj lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON InterjTag
+Interj: K ;


! ============ !
! Postp lexica !
! ============ !


! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
! to extensive declension
LEXICON PostpTag
+Po: K ;



! ==================================== !
! Lexica called End, whatever they are !
! ==================================== !


LEXICON Ad-ATag ! 
+AdA: # ;

LEXICON AdvTag ! 
+Adv: K ;


LEXICON SpatTag
+Spat: K ;


!!Temporal tags with cases
LEXICON TempTag
+Adv+Temp: K ;


LEXICON ConjTag
#;

LEXICON Cc
+CC: # ;

LEXICON Cs
+CS: # ;


LEXICON Pcle-Compar-Stnd
+Pcle+Compar: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Epist
+Pcle+Epist: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg-Contrast
+Pcle+Neg+Intensive: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg
+Pcle+Neg: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Superl
+Pcle+Superl: # ;

LEXICON PcleTag
+Pcle: # ;


LEXICON N-Voc-Px1Sg
+N+Px1Sg+Interj+Voc: # ;

!LEXICON EndNeg 
!+CC+Neg: # ; ! ни

!LEXICON EndQST
!+Qst: # ;

!LEXICON ONOM-End
!+Onom: # ;

LEXICON DescrTag
+Descr: # ;



! ======= !
! Ks !
! ======= !


LEXICON K
            # ; 



! List of spurious lexica
! These should be fixed.


! This lexicon would allow a loop whereby any full form
! could be treated as a noun
! E.G. мезеяк # 'anything'
! E.G. мезеяк+ось # 'This _anything_ you are talking about'
!LEXICON Encapsulate


!LEXICON ADV-SUPERL
!+Adv+Superl: # ;


LEXICON TESTINGTESTING

Ыджыд TESTCOMP ;
син TESTCOMP ;
официал TESTCOMP ;
радиоактив TESTCOMP ;

LEXICON TESTCOMP

+CmpTest: # ;


!!!



! TODO: Integrate this in xml-files in working…

!LEXICON SUBSTANDARDS 
!коръя+Use/Sub:корья Noun1 ;
